District of Columbia statutes.
32-807

Director of Industrial Safety.

The Board is hereby authorized to employ a Director of Industrial Safety, who shall not be a member of the Board. The Director shall perform such duties as may be prescribed by the Board in administering the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 7
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, ch. 782, title XI, § 1106(a)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(k), 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-227.
1973 Ed., § 36-437.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.